North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 9. Validation of Notarial Acts.

§ 10B-65.
Acts of notaries public in certain instances validated.

Any acknowledgment taken and any instrument notarized by a person prior to qualification as a notary public but after commissioning or recommissioning as a notary public, or by a person whose notary commission has expired, is validated. The acknowledgment and instrument have the same legal effect as if the person qualified as a notary public at the time the person performed the act.

All documents bearing a notarial seal and that contain any of the following errors are validated and given the same legal effect as if the errors had not occurred:

The date of the expiration of the notary’s commission is stated, whether correctly or erroneously.

The notarial seal does not contain a readable impression of the notary’s name, contains an incorrect spelling of the notary’s name, or does not bear the name of the notary exactly as it appears on the commission, as required under

G.S. 10B-37

.

The notary’s signature does not comport exactly with the name on the notary commission or on the notary seal, as required by

G.S. 10B-20

.

The notarial seal contains typed, printed, drawn, or handwritten material added to the seal, fails to contain the words “North Carolina” or the abbreviation “NC”, or contains correct information except that instead of the abbreviation for North Carolina contains the abbreviation for another state.

The date of the acknowledgement, the verification or proof, or the oath or affirmation states the correct day and month but lacks a year or states an incorrect year.

All deeds of trust in which the notary was named in the document as a trustee only are validated.

All notary acknowledgments performed before July 1, 2013, bearing a notarial seal are validated.

This section applies to notarial acts performed on or before April 1, 2021.

History.

1945, c. 665; 1947, c. 313; 1949, c. 1; 1953, c. 702; 1961, cc. 483, 734; 1965, c. 37; 1969, c. 83; c. 716, s. 1; 1971, c. 229, s. 1; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1977, c. 734, s. 1; 1979, c. 226, s. 2; c. 643, s. 1; 1981, c. 164, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 205, s. 1; 1985, c. 71, s. 1; 1987, c. 277, s. 9; 1989, c. 390, s. 9; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1997-19, s. 1; 1997-469, s. 2; 1998-228, s. 10; 1999-21, s. 2; 2001-154, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 27; 2003-38, s. 1; 2004-199, s. 6; 2005-391, s. 4; 2008-194, s. 5; 2013-204, s. 1.5; 2021-91, s. 4(a).

§ 10B-66.
Certain notarial acts validated.

Any acknowledgment taken and any instrument notarized by a person whose notarial commission was revoked on or before January 30, 1997, is hereby validated.

This section applies to notarial acts performed on or before August 1, 1998.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-67.
Erroneous commission expiration date cured.

An erroneous statement of the date that the notary’s commission expires shall not affect the sufficiency, validity, or enforceability of the notarial certificate or the related record if the notary is, in fact, lawfully commissioned at the time of the notarial act. This section applies to notarial acts whenever performed.

History.

2006-59, s. 24; 2013-204, s. 1.6.

§ 10B-68.
Technical defects cured.

Technical defects, errors, or omissions in a notarial certificate shall not affect the sufficiency, validity, or enforceability of the notarial certificate or the related instrument or document.

Defects in the commissioning or recommissioning of a notary that are approved by the Department are cured. This subsection applies to commissions and recommissions issued on or after December 1, 2005.

As used in this section, a technical defect includes those cured under G.S. 10B-37(f) and

G.S. 10B-67

. Other technical defects include, but are not limited to, the absence of the legible appearance of the notary’s name exactly as shown on the notary’s commission as required in G.S. 10B-20(b), the affixation of the notary’s seal near the signature of the principal or subscribing witness rather than near the notary’s signature, minor typographical mistakes in the spelling of the principal’s name, the failure to acknowledge the principal’s name exactly as signed by including or omitting initials, or the failure to specify the principal’s title or office, if any.

History.

2006-59, s. 24; 2006-199, s. 2; 2013-204, s. 1.7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-199, s. 2, effective July 1, 2006, added the second sentence of subsection (a); added subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c); and, in subsection (c), deleted “and defects in the commissioning or recommissioning of the notary that were approved by the Department under this Chapter” at the end of the second sentence and added the third sentence.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.7, effective June 26, 2013, deleted the former last sentence in subsection (a), which read: “This subsection applies to notarial certificates made on or after December 1, 2005”; and, in subsection (c), inserted “but are not limited to” and “the affixation of the notary’s seal . . . principal’s title or office, if any,” in the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read “This subsection applies to notarial certificates made on or after December 1, 2005.”

§ 10B-69.
Official forms cured.

The notarial certificate contained in a form issued by a State agency prior to April 1, 2021, is deemed to be a valid certificate so long as the certificate complied with the law at the time the form was issued.

The notarization using a certificate under subsection (a) of this section is deemed valid if executed in compliance with the law at the time the form was issued.

History.

2006-59, s. 24; 2013-204, s. 1.8; 2021-91, s. 4(b).

§ 10B-70.
Certain notarial acts for local government agencies validated.

Any acknowledgment taken and any instrument notarized for a local government agency by a person prior to qualification as a notary public but after commissioning or recommissioning as a notary public, by a person whose notary commission has expired, or by a person who failed to qualify within 45 days of commissioning as required by

G.S. 10B-10

, is hereby validated. The acknowledgment and instrument shall have the same legal effect as if the person qualified as a notary public at the time the person performed the act. This section shall apply to notarial acts performed for a local government agency on or after October 31, 2006, and before June 30, 2007.

Any electronic document filed in the Mecklenburg County Register of Deeds office that purports to be notarized in the Commonwealth of Virginia and that contains the typed name of a Virginia notary together with the notary’s expiration date shall be given the same legal effect as if the person performed a lawful notarization in Virginia.

History.

2007-484, s. 27; 2008-194, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-194, s. 4, effective August 8, 2008, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

§ 10B-71.
Certain notarial acts validated when recommissioned notary failed to again take oath.

Any acknowledgment taken and any instrument notarized by a person who after recommissioning failed to again take the oath as a notary public is validated. The acknowledgment and instrument have the same legal effect as if the person qualified as a notary public at the time the person performed the act. This section applies to notarial acts performed on or after May 15, 2004, and before April 1, 2021.

History.

2009-358, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.9; 2021-91, s. 4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.9, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “July 8, 2009” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(c), effective October 1, 2021, deleted “hereby” preceding “validated” in the first sentence; deleted “shall” following “instrument” in the second sentence; and substituted “applies” for “shall apply,” and “April 1, 2021” for “April 1, 2013” in the last sentence.

§ 10B-72.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-91, s. 5, effective October 1, 2021.

History.

2012-194, s. 65; repealed by 2021-91, s. 5, effective October 1, 2021.

§§ 10B-73 through 10B-98.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 10B-99.
Presumption of regularity.

In the absence of evidence of fraud on the part of the notary, or evidence of a knowing and deliberate violation of this Article by the notary, the courts shall grant a presumption of regularity to notarial acts so that those acts may be upheld, provided there has been substantial compliance with the law. Nothing in this Chapter modifies or repeals the common law doctrine of substantial compliance in effect on November 30, 2005.

A notarial act shall be deemed valid if it complies with the law as it existed on or before December 1, 2005. This section applies to notarial acts whenever performed.

History.

2006-59, s. 24; 2006-199, s. 4; 2013-204, s. 1.10.